Final source/morphy/foma/N.lexc
!!!SinhalaCN.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N % +verb% %|% +part  +past% %=த்% %|% Part +PresPart +3P +2P +1P +past% %=த்% %|%  +Pres +Fut +Sg +Pl +Masc +Fem +Rat +Irr +Euph +Sandhi +Neg +Comp +Imp +Inf +RelPart +Con +Causal +Temp +Neu +PartNoun % +verb% %|% erbNoun +gerundPres +presParticiple

LEXICON Root

ClassOne ;

LEXICON ClassOne


​බො   C1Vinf;
 

LEXICON C1Vinf

% +verb:^ #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +3pl:^ති #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +bless% +non% +3sg:^ත්වා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2sg:^නවා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2pl:^නවාලා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2sg:^නු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2sg:^න්න #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +3sgf:^න්නීය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +1sg:^න්නෙමි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +bless% +non% +1sg:^න්නෙමිවා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +1pl:^න්නෙමු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +bless% +non% +1pl:^න්නෙමුවා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +2sg:^න්නෙහි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +bless% +non% +2sg:^න්නෙහිවා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +3sg:^න්නේය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +3pl:^න්නෝය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2sg:^ීපන් #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2pl:^ීපල්ලා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +1sg:^මි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +bless% +non% +1sg:^මිවා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +1pl:^මු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +bless% +non% +1pl:^මුවා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +3sg:^යි #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non% +mixV:^මින් #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non% +preV:^ී #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^න්නට #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +past:^නලද #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +past:^නුලැබූ #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^ද්දී #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past:^නලදී #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +past:^වු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past% +1sg:^ව්වෙමි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past% +1pl:^වුවෙමු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past% +2sg:^​ව්වෙ​හි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past% +2pl:^​ව්වෙ​හු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past% +3sg:^​ව්වාය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past% +3sg:^​ව්වේය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past% +3pl:^​ව්වෝය #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^ිය #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^ව්වොත් #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +past:^ව්වේ #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^න්නේ #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^න #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^නුයේ #;
